en: Textile craft project type: Crocheting; Cross-stitching; Embellishments; Hand embroidery; Knitting; Quilting; Sewing project; Upholstery crafting; Weaving; Other
ru: Тип проекта по работе с текстилем: Вязание крючком; Вышивка крестиком; Украшения; Ручная вышивка; Вязание; Лоскутное шитье; Проект по шитью; Изготовление обивки; Ткачество; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta projekta tekstilne obrti: Kvačkanje; Gobelin; Okraski; Vezenje; Pletenje; Prešivanje; Šivalni projekt; Tapetništvo; Tkanje; Drugo
ko: 직물 공예 프로젝트 유형: 코바늘뜨기; 십자수; 장식; 손 자수; 대바늘뜨기; 퀼팅; 봉제 프로젝트; 커버 제작; 직조; 기타
nb: Prosjekttype for tekstilhåndverk: Hekling; Korssting; Utsmykninger; Håndbroderi; Strikking; Quilting; Syprosjekt; Utarbeiding av møbeltrekk; Veving; Annen
ro-RO: Tip proiect de artizanat textil: Croșetat; Cusătură în cruce; Ornamente; Broderie manuală; Tricotat; Matlasare; Proiect de cusut; Confecționare tapițerie; Țesut; Altele
es: Tipo de proyecto de artesanía textil: Ganchillo; Punto de cruz; Adornos; Bordado a mano; Tejeduría; Colchas; Proyecto de costura; Elaboración de tapicería; Tejido; Otros
tr: Tekstil zanaat proje türü: Tığ işi; Çapraz dikiş; Süslemeler; El nakışı; Örgü örmek; Kapitone; Dikiş projesi; Döşeme işçiliği; Dokumacılık; Diğer
th: ประเภทโครงการหัตถกรรมสิ่งทอ: การถักโครเชต์; การปักครอสติช; เครื่องตกแต่ง; งานปักผ้าด้วยมือ; การถักนิตติง; การควิลท์; โครงการตัดเย็บ; การทำงานฝีมือเครื่องเรือนเครื่องเบาะ; การทอผ้า; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος έργου κλωστοϋφαντουργίας: Κροσέ; Σταυροβελονιά; Διακοσμήσεις; Κέντημα στο χέρι; Πλέξιμο; Καπιτονέ; Έργο ραπτικής; Κατασκευή ταπετσαριών; Ύφανση; Άλλο
zh-TW: 紡織工藝項目類型: 鉤編; 十字繡; 裝飾品; 手工刺繡; 針織; 絎縫; 縫紉項目; 室內裝潢工藝; 編織; 其他
it: Tipo di progetto dell’attività tessile: Uncinetto; Punto croce; Decorazioni; Ricamo a mano; Maglieria; Impuntitura; Progetto di cucito; Lavorazione della tappezzeria; Tessitura; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de projeto de artesanato têxtil: Crochê; Ponto cruz; Enfeites; Bordado manual; Tricô; Acolchoado; Projeto de costura; Confecção de estofados; Tecelagem; Outro
bg-BG: Тип текстилен занаятчийски проект: Плетене на една кука; Кръстат бод; Декорации; Ръчна бродерия; Плетене; Капитониране; Проект за шиене; Изработка на тапицерии; Тъкане; Други
hu: Textilipari tevékenység típusa: Horgolás; Keresztöltés; Díszítések; Kézi hímzés; Kötés; Foltvarrás; Varrással készített termék; Kárpitkészítés; Szövés; Egyéb
fi: Tekstiilikäsityöprojektityyppi: Virkkaaminen; Ristipistotyöt; Koristeet; Käsinkirjonta; Neulominen; Täkkien valmistus; Ompeluprojekti; Verhoilukäsityö; Kudonta; Muu
pl: Typ projektu rzemiosła tekstylnego: Szydełkowanie; Szwy krzyżykowe; Ozdobniki; Haft ręczny; Dziewiarstwo; Pikowanie tkanin; Projekt krawiecki; Wykonanie tapicerki; Tkactwo; Pozostałe
fr: Type de projet d’artisanat textile: Crochet; Point de croix; Décorations; Broderie à la main; Tricot; Piquage; Projet de couture; Fabrication de tissus d’ameublement; Tissage; Autre
ja: 織物制作の種類: かぎ針編み; クロスステッチ; 装飾; 手刺繍; 編み物; キルティング; 裁縫制作; 椅子張り生地作り; 織物; その他
nl: Type textielambachtproject: Haken; Kruissteken; Versieringen; Borduurwerk; Breien; Quilten; Naaiproject; Bekleding knutselen; Weven; Andere
sv: Typ av textilhantverksprojekt: Virkning; Korsstygn; Utsmyckning; Handbroderi; Stickning; Kviltning; Syprojekt; Klädseltillverkning; Vävning; Annat
lt-LT: Tekstilės rankdarbių projekto tipas: Nėrimas; Siuvinėjimas kryželiu; Papuošimai; Siuvinėjimas ranka; Mezgimas; Dygsniavimas; Siuvimo projektas; Apmušalų gamyba; Audimas; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de projeto de artesanato têxtil: Croché; Ponto cruz; Adornos; Bordados à mão; Tricô; Acolchoamento; Projeto de costura; Fabrico de estofos; Tecelagem; Outro
da: Tekstilhåndværkprojekttype: Hækling; Korssting; Udsmykninger; Håndbroderi; Strikning; Quilting; Syprojekt; Udarbejdelse af polstring; Vævning; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta projekta za izradu tekstilnih rukotvorina: Heklanje; Križni bod; Dekorativni elementi; Ručni vez; Pletenje; Prošivanje; Projekt šivanja; Izrada presvlaka; Tkanje; Ostalo
vi: Loại dự án dệt thủ công: Đan bằng kim móc; Thêu chữ thập; Làm đẹp; Thêu tay; Đan; May chần; Dự án may; Chế tạo đồ nệm ghế; Dệt; Khác
de: Typ des Textilbastelprojekts: Häkeln; Kreuzstich; Verzierungen; Handstickerei; Stricken; Steppen; Nähprojekt; Polsterhandwerk; Weberei; Sonstiges
cs: Typ textilního řemeslného projektu: Háčkování; Křížkové vyšívání; Ozdoby; Ruční výšivky; Pletení; Prošívání; Šicí projekt; Výroba čalounění; Tkaní; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ textilného remesla: Háčkovanie; Krížikové prešívanie; Ozdoby; Ručné vyšívanie; Pletenie; Prešívanie; Šitie; Výroba čalúnenia; Tkanie; Iné
zh-CN: 纺织工艺项目类型: 钩编; 十字绣; 装饰品; 手工刺绣; 针织; 绗缝; 缝纫项目; 室内装潢工艺; 编织; 其他